New Jersey, session 222, A3692.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 75 State Subsidies and Financial Aid STATE AID 04-8030  Local Government Services ................................... $150,000 Total General Fund appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid....................... $150,000 State Aid: 04    Atlantic County Animal Shelter.............. ($150,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Atlantic County Animal Shelters spay-and-neuter clinic shall be made available to implement a one-year pilot clinic, with participants provided free spay, neuter, and vaccination services. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.